Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2585.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 36, chapter 29, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 36-2905.05, to read: START_STATUTE36-2905.05. Contractors; reimbursement; noncontracting providers; prohibitions A. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary: 1. A contractor shall reimburse a noncontracting provider for laboratory services rendered to a member who is enrolled with the contractor if the member was referred by a contracted provider of the contractor. 2. A contractor may not require prior authorization for diagnostic services. B. A contractor may not take or threaten to take retaliatory action against a contracted provider for referring a member to a noncontracted provider. END_STATUTE